District of Columbia statutes.
19-114

Right of surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner if there is no renunciation.

A surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner who does not renounce as provided by section 19-113 is entitled to the benefit of all provisions in his favor in the will of the deceased spouse or deceased domestic partner and shall share, in accordance with sections 19-301 and 19-302 in any estate of the deceased spouse or deceased domestic partner undisposed of by the will.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 697, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 5(i), 53 DCR 1035
This section is referenced in § 19-112 and § 19-113.
1981 Ed., § 19-114.
1973 Ed., § 19-114.
D.C. Law 16-79 rewrote section which had read as follows: “A surviving spouse who does not renounce as provided by section 19-113 is entitled to the benefit of all provisions in his favor in the will of the deceased spouse and shall share, in accordance with sections 19-301, 19-302, 19-303, 19-304, and 20-1901, in any estate of the deceased spouse undisposed of by the will.”
The reference to section 20-1901, appearing near the end of this section, is no longer accurate in light of the revisions of Title 20 by the Act of June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72 and by D.C. Law 10-241.